application/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<!--Added by Riya on 20 Dec,2022 for hindi generation-->
<pardef n="saba/__p">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>meM</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM_se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM_se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM_se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>meM_se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>para</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>para</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>para</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>para</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="saba"><i>saba</i><par n="saba/__p"/></e>
